Tennessee, session 114, SB0744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before July 1, 2025, the commissioner of health shall add alpha-gal
syndrome to the department of health's published list of reportable diseases and conditions, the
occurrence of which must be reported to the department by a healthcare provider pursuant to
administrative rule.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0744
000032
- 1 -